California statutes. Public Resources Code
(A) “Flexible demand” means the capability to schedule, shift, or curtail the electrical demand of a load-serving entity’s customer or a local publicly owned electric utility’s customer through direct action by the customer or through action by a third party, the load-serving entity, or a grid balancing authority, with the customer’s consent.

(B) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380 of the Public Utilities
 Code.

(C) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 15.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.1.

To implement the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop a public domain computer program that will enable contractors, builders, architects, engineers, and government officials to estimate the energy consumed by residential and nonresidential buildings. The commission may charge a fee for the use of the program, which fee shall be based on the actual cost of the program, including any computer costs.

(b) Establish a formal process for certification of compliance options for new products, materials, and calculation methods that provides for adequate technical and public review to ensure accurate,
 equitable, and timely evaluation of certification applications. Proponents filing applications for new products, materials, and calculation methods shall provide all information needed to evaluate the application that is required by the commission. The commission shall publish annually the results of its certification decisions and instructions to users and local building officials concerning requirements for showing compliance with the building standards for new products, materials, or calculation methods. The commission may charge and collect a reasonable fee from applicants to cover the costs under this subdivision. Any funds received by the commission for purposes of this subdivision shall be deposited into the Energy Resources Programs Account and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the commission for the purposes of this subdivision. Any unencumbered portion of funds collected as a fee for an application remaining in the Energy Resources Programs
 Account after completion of the certification process for that application shall be returned to the applicant within a reasonable period of time.

(c) Include a prescriptive method of complying with the standards, including design aids such as a manual, sample calculations, and model structural designs.

(d) Conduct a pilot project of field testing of actual residential buildings to calibrate and identify potential needed changes in the modeling assumptions to increase the accuracy of the public domain computer program specified in subdivision (a) and to evaluate the impacts of the standards, including, but not limited to, the energy savings, cost-effectiveness, and the effects on indoor air quality. The pilot project shall be conducted pursuant to a contract entered into by the commission. The commission shall consult with the participants designated pursuant to Section 9202 of the
 Public Utilities Code to seek funding and support for field monitoring in each public utility service territory, with the University of California to take advantage of its extensive building monitoring expertise, and with the California Building Industry Association to coordinate the involvement of builders and developers throughout the state. The pilot project shall include periodic public workshops to develop plans and review progress.

(e) Certify, not later than 180 days after approval of the standards by the California Building Standards Commission, an energy conservation manual for use by designers, builders, and contractors of residential and nonresidential buildings. The manual shall be furnished upon request at a price sufficient to cover the costs of production and shall be distributed at no cost to all affected local agencies. The manual shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The standards for energy conservation established by the commission.

(2) Forms, charts, tables, and other data to assist designers and builders in meeting the standards.

(3) Design suggestions for meeting or exceeding the standards.

(4) Any other information that the commission finds will assist persons in conforming to the standards.

(5) Instructions for use of the computer program for calculating energy consumption in residential and nonresidential buildings.

(6) The prescriptive method for use as an alternative to the computer program.

(f) The commission shall
 establish a continuing program of technical assistance to local building departments in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section. The program shall include the training of local officials in building technology and enforcement procedures related to energy conservation, and the development of complementary training programs conducted by local governments, educational institutions, and other public or private entities. The technical assistance program shall include the preparation and publication of forms and procedures for local building departments in performing the review of building plans and specifications. The commission shall provide, on a contract basis, a review of building plans and specifications submitted by a local building department, and shall adopt a schedule of fees sufficient to repay the cost of those services.

(g) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section, and the rules and
 regulations of the commission adopted pursuant thereto, shall be enforced by the building department of every city, county, or city and county.

(1) A building permit for any residential or nonresidential building shall not be issued by a local building department, unless a review by the building department of the plans for the proposed residential or nonresidential building contains detailed energy system specifications and confirms that the building satisfies the minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 25402 and this section applicable to the building.

(2) Where there is no local building department, the commission shall enforce subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section.

(3) If a local building department fails to enforce subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402,
 this section, or any other provision of this chapter or standard adopted pursuant thereto, the commission may provide enforcement after furnishing 10 days’ written notice to the local building department.

(4) A city, county, or city and county may, by ordinance or resolution, prescribe a schedule of fees sufficient to pay the costs incurred in the enforcement of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section. The commission may establish a schedule of fees sufficient to pay the costs incurred by that enforcement.

(5) The construction of any state building shall not commence until the Department of General Services or the state agency that otherwise has jurisdiction over the property reviews the plans for the proposed building and certifies that the plans satisfy the minimum standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Chapter 2.8 (commencing with Section
 15814.30) of Part 10b of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 25402, and this section that are applicable to the building.

(h) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section shall apply only to new residential and nonresidential buildings on which actual site preparation and construction have not commenced before the effective date of rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those sections that are applicable to those buildings. Those sections do not prohibit either of the following:

(1) The enforcement of state or local energy conservation or energy insulation standards, adopted before the effective date of rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section with regard to residential and nonresidential buildings on which actual site preparation and construction have commenced before that date.

(2) The enforcement of city or county energy conservation or energy insulation standards, whenever adopted, with regard to residential and nonresidential buildings on which actual site preparation and construction have not commenced before the effective date of rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 and this section, if the city or county files the basis of its determination that the standards are cost effective with the commission and the commission finds that the standards will require the diminution of energy consumption levels permitted by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those sections. If, after two or more years after the filing with the commission of the determination that those standards are cost effective, there has been a substantial change in the factual circumstances affecting the determination, upon application by any interested party, the city or county shall update and file
 a new basis of its determination that the standards are cost effective. The determination that the standards are cost effective shall be adopted by the governing body of the city or county at a public meeting. If, at the meeting on the matter, the governing body determines that the standards are no longer cost effective, the standards shall, as of that date, be unenforceable and a building permit or other entitlement shall not be denied based on the noncompliance with the standards.

(i) The commission may exempt from the requirements of this section and of any regulations adopted pursuant thereto any proposed building for which compliance would be impossible without substantial delays and increases in cost of construction, if the commission finds that substantial funds have been expended in good faith on planning, designing, architecture, or engineering before the date of adoption of the regulations.

(j) If a dispute arises between an applicant for a building permit, or the state pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), and the building department regarding interpretation of Section 25402 or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, either party may submit the dispute to the commission for resolution. The commission’s determination of the matter shall be binding on the parties.

(k) Sections 25130, 25131, and 25402, and this section, do not prevent enforcement of any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, or Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 19878) of Part 3 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code as they existed before September 16, 1977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 16.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.2.

Any standard adopted by the commission pursuant to Sections 25402 and 25402.1, which is a building standard as defined in Section 25488.5, shall be submitted to the State Building Standards Commission for approval pursuant to, and is governed by, the State Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code). Building standards adopted by the commission and published in the State Building Standards Code shall be enforced as provided in Sections 25402 and 25402.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.3.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 25402.1, the commission shall contract with California building officials to establish two regional training centers to provide continuing education for local building officials and enforcement personnel as follows:

(a) One site shall be located in northern California and one site shall be located in southern California to serve the needs of the respective regions.

(b) The centers shall provide training on a monthly basis to ensure a uniform understanding and implementation of the energy efficient building standards. Existing resources shall be used as much as possible by utilizing members of the building official community in training activities.

(c) The centers shall provide similar training sessions, in the form of workshops given in designated rural areas, to ensure that adequate training is available throughout the state.

(1) A minimum of two workshops in northern California and two workshops in southern California shall be offered each year.

(2) The sites shall be selected to ensure the greatest number of participants will be served in areas of greatest need to decrease the financial burden on small rural or isolated local government agencies that would not be able to travel to the regional training centers for instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1429, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.4.

The standards for nonresidential buildings prescribed by the commission pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25402 shall provide at least one option which uses passive or semipassive thermal systems, as defined in Section 25600, for meeting the prescribed energy use requirements. These systems may include, but are not limited to, the following construction techniques:

(a) Use of skylights or other daylighting techniques.

(b) Use of openable windows or other means of using outside air for space conditioning.

(c) Use of building orientation, to complement other passive or semipassive thermal systems.

(d) Use of thermal mass, of structural or nonstructural type, for storage of heat or cold, including, but not limited to, roof ponds and water walls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1419, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.5.

(a) As used in this section, “lighting device” includes, but is not limited to, a lamp, luminaire, light fixture, lighting control, ballast, or any component of those devices.

(b) (1) The commission shall consider both new and replacement, and both interior and exterior, lighting devices as lighting which is subject to subdivision (a) of Section 25402.

(2) The commission shall include both indoor and outdoor lighting devices as appliances to be considered in prescribing standards pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 25402.

(3) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that paragraphs (1) and (2) are declarative of existing law.

(c) The commission shall adopt efficiency standards for outdoor lighting. The standards shall be technologically feasible and cost-effective. As used in this subdivision, “outdoor lighting” refers to all electrical lighting that is not subject to standards adopted pursuant to Section 25402, and includes, but is not limited to, street lights, traffic lights, parking lot lighting, and billboard lighting. The commission shall consult with the Department of Transportation (CALTRANS) to ensure that outdoor lighting standards that affect CALTRANS are compatible with that department’s policies and standards for safety and illumination levels on state highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 4.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.5.4.

(a) On or before December 31, 2008, the commission shall adopt minimum energy efficiency standards for all general purpose lights on a schedule specified in the regulations. The regulations, in combination with other programs and activities affecting lighting use in the state, shall be structured to reduce average statewide electrical energy consumption by not less than 50 percent from the 2007 levels for indoor residential lighting and by not less than 25 percent from the 2007 levels for indoor commercial and outdoor lighting, by 2018.

(b) The commission shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature regarding how to continue reductions in electrical consumption for lighting beyond 2018.

(c) The commission may establish programs to encourage the sale in this state of general purpose lights that meet or exceed the standards set forth in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the Department of General Services, and all other state agencies, as defined in Section 12200 of the Public Contract Code, in coordination with the commission, shall cease purchasing general purpose lights that do not meet the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), within two years of those standards being adopted.

(2) The Department of General Services, and all other state agencies, as defined in Section 12200 of the Public Contract Code, in coordination with the commission shall cease purchasing general purpose lights with an appearance that is historically appropriate for the facilities in which the lights are being used, and that do not meet the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) within four years of those standards being adopted.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the Regents of the University of California, in coordination with the commission, to cease purchasing general purpose lights that do not meet the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), within two years of those standards being adopted.

(f) (1) (A) For purposes of this section, “general purpose lights” means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other electric devices that provide functional illumination for indoor residential, indoor commercial, and outdoor use.

(B) General purpose lights do not include any of the following types of specialty lighting: appliance, black light, bug, colored, infrared, left-hand thread, marine, marine signal service, mine service, plant light, reflector, rough service, shatter resistant, sign service, silver bowl, showcase, three-way, traffic signal, and vibration service or vibration resistant.

(2) The commission may, after one or more public workshops, with public notice and an opportunity for all interested parties to comment, provide for inclusion of a particular type of specialty light in its energy efficiency standards applicable to general purpose lighting, if it finds that there has been a significant increase in sales of that particular type of particular specialty light due to the use of that specialty light in general purpose lighting applications.

(3) General purpose lights do not include lights needed to provide special-needs lighting for individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.7.

(a) In consultation with the commission, electric and gas utilities shall provide support for building standards and other regulations pursuant to Section 25402, including appropriate research, development, and training to implement those standards and other regulations.

(b) The electric and gas utilities shall provide support pursuant to subdivision (a) only to the extent that funds are made available to the utilities for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 18.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.8.

When assessing new building standards for residential and nonresidential buildings relating to the conservation of energy, the commission shall include in its deliberations the impact that those standards would have on indoor air pollution problems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.9.

(a) On or before July 1, 1996, the commission shall develop, adopt, and publish an informational booklet to educate and inform homeowners, rental property owners, renters, sellers, brokers, and the general public about the statewide home energy rating program adopted pursuant to Section 25942.

(b) In the development of the booklet, the commission shall consult with representatives of the Bureau of Real Estate, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Public Utilities Commission, investor-owned and municipal utilities, cities and counties, real estate licensees, homebuilders, mortgage lenders, home appraisers and inspectors, home
 energy rating organizations, contractors who provide home energy services,
 consumer groups, and environmental groups.

(c) The commission shall charge a fee for the informational booklet to recover its costs under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 483.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.10.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) To “benchmark,” in reference to energy use, means to obtain information on the energy use in an entire building for a specific period to enable that usage to be tracked or compared against other buildings.

(2) “Covered building” means either or both of the following:

(A) Any building with no residential utility accounts.

(B) Any building with five or more active utility accounts,
 residential or nonresidential.

(3) “Energy” means electricity, natural gas, steam, or fuel oil sold by a utility to a customer for end uses addressed by the ENERGY STAR Portfolio Manager or any alternative system or tool approved by the commission.

(4) “ENERGY STAR Portfolio Manager” means the tool developed and maintained by the United States Environmental Protection Agency to track and assess the energy performance of buildings.

(b) On and after January 1, 2016, each utility shall maintain records of the energy usage data of all buildings to which they provide service for at least the most recent 12 complete calendar months.

(c) (1) Subject to the requirements of paragraph (2), on and after January 1, 2017, each utility shall, upon the request and written authorization or secure electronic authorization of the owner, owner’s agent, or operator of a covered building, deliver or otherwise provide aggregated energy usage data for a covered building to the owner, owner’s agent, or building operator, or to the owner’s account in the ENERGY STAR Portfolio
 Manager or any alternative system or tool approved by the commission. The commission may specify additional information to be delivered by utilities to enable building owners to complete benchmarking of the energy use in their buildings and in other systems or formats for information delivery and automation.

(2) The delivery of information by utilities pursuant to this section shall be subject to the following requirements:

(A) For covered buildings with three or more active utility accounts, each utility shall deliver information showing the aggregated energy usage data of all utility customers in the same building for each of the 12 prior months. Notwithstanding any other law, energy usage data aggregated in this manner shall not be deemed customer utility usage
 information or confidential information by the utility for purposes of delivery to the owner, owner’s agent, or operator of a building. The building owner and utility shall not have any liability for any use or disclosure of aggregated energy usage data delivered as required by this section.

(B) For covered buildings not subject to subparagraph (A), each utility shall deliver the information showing the aggregated energy usage data of all utility customers in each covered building for each of the prior 12 months if the accountholder provides written or electronic consent for the delivery of the accountholder’s energy usage data to the owner, owner’s agent, operator, or utility.

(C) Each utility shall deliver, upload, or otherwise provide aggregated energy usage data within four weeks of
 receiving a request from an owner, owner’s agent, or operator of a covered building.

(D) Each utility shall make available the covered building energy usage data aggregated at a monthly level unless otherwise specified by the commission.

(E) The building owner and utility shall not have any liability for any use or disclosure by others of usage information delivered as required by this section.

(d) The commission shall adopt regulations providing for the delivery to the commission and public disclosure of benchmarking of energy use for covered buildings, as follows:

(1) This subdivision does not require the owner of a building with less than 50,000
 square feet of gross floor space or with 16 or fewer residential utility accounts to collect or deliver energy usage information to the commission.

(2) The commission may do, but is not limited to doing, all of the following in regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision:

(A) Identify and provide for the collection of the energy usage data for calculations for the purpose of benchmarking energy use.

(B) Identify and provide for the collection of the covered building characteristic information deemed necessary by the commission for the calculations for the purpose of benchmarking energy use.

(C) Specify the manner in which certain benchmarking of energy use
 shall be publicly disclosed.

(D) Determine which covered buildings, in addition to those described in paragraph (1), are not subject to the public disclosure requirement.

(E) Set a schedule to implement the requirements for public disclosure adopted by the commission.

(F) Determine if compliance with a local or county benchmarking program fulfills the commission’s requirements adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(G) Identify categories of information it receives pursuant to this section that are protected from release under either the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or the Information
 Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(3) The commission shall determine who will deliver the energy usage data and related information for any covered building to the commission.

(e) The commission may ensure timely and accurate compliance with the data submission requirements of this section by using the enforcement measures identified in Section 25321. An owner of a covered building, or its agents or operators, shall not be liable for any noncompliance due to the failure of a utility to provide the information required for compliance.

(f) For buildings that are not covered buildings, and for customer information that is not aggregated
 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the commission may adopt regulations prescribing how utilities shall either obtain the customer’s permission or determine that a building owner has obtained the customer’s permission, for the owner to receive aggregated energy usage data or, where applicable, individual customer usage information, including by use of electronic authorization and in a lease agreement between the owner and the customer.

(g) The reasonable costs of an electrical or gas corporation in delivering electrical or gas usage data pursuant to this section or other information as required under state or federal law or by an order of the commission shall be recoverable in rates evaluated and approved by the Public Utilities Commission.

(h) The reasonable costs of local publicly owned electric utilities in disclosing electrical usage data pursuant to this section may be considered “cost-effective demand-side management services to promote energy efficiency and energy conservation” and thereby reimbursable by their general funds.

(i) (1) For purposes of adopting or revising regulations pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission may include two or more buildings located on a single parcel or adjacent parcels with the same owner of record and with five or more active utility accounts, in aggregate, residential or nonresidential, as a single covered building, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) An electrical or gas utility shall provide to the owner,
 owner’s agent, or operator of a property containing two or more buildings on a single parcel or adjacent parcels with five or more active utility accounts, in aggregate, residential or nonresidential, upon request of the owner, agent, or operator, aggregate energy usage data on all such buildings in a manner provided pursuant to subdivision (c) as if those buildings are a single covered building, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(j) This section does not prevent a city or county from establishing its own benchmarking program requiring collection, delivery, and disclosure of building information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 765, Sec. 1.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.11.

(a) (1) The commission may adopt regulations establishing an administrative enforcement process for a violation of a regulation adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 25402 and for the assessment of an administrative civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. The process shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) In assessing the amount of an administrative penalty, the commission shall consider all of the following factors:

(A) The nature and seriousness of the
 violation.

(B) The number of violations.

(C) The persistence of the violation.

(D) The length of time over which the violation occurred.

(E) The willfulness of the violation.

(F) The violator’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(G) The harm to consumers and to the state that resulted from the amount of energy wasted due to the violation.

(b) If the commission finds that a violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 25402 has occurred or is threatening to occur, the commission may refer the matter to the Attorney General
 to petition a court to enjoin the violation. The court may grant prohibitory or mandatory injunctive relief as warranted by issuing a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, and may assess a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, considering the factors specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) Penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Appliance Efficiency Enforcement Subaccount, which is hereby established in the Energy Resources Programs Account. The moneys in the Appliance Efficiency Enforcement Subaccount may be expended by the commission, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the education of the public regarding appliance energy efficiency and for the enforcement of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 25402.

(d) An order imposing an administrative civil penalty shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25534.2.

(e) A person shall not be liable for a civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (b) if that person is subject to an administrative civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) In a civil action brought on behalf of the commission pursuant to this section, upon granting relief, the court shall award to the commission the reasonable costs incurred by the commission in investigating and prosecuting the action.

(g) The commission shall not initiate an administrative enforcement process pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to this section against an entity for the unlawful sale or the unlawful offer for sale of an appliance if both of the following
 apply:

(1) The appliance fully complies with all of the requirements of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 25402.

(2) The only basis for the commission’s potential enforcement action is that the appliance is not considered to be in compliance because of the commission’s delay in reviewing and processing information submitted to it that demonstrates full compliance.

(h) In addition to the prohibitions specified in subdivision (g), the commission shall not initiate an administrative enforcement process pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to this section for a violation of a standard adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 25402 until both of the following occur:

(1) No fewer than 60 days have
 elapsed since the date when the standard was published in the California Register.

(2) No fewer than 30 days have elapsed since the date when the alleged violator received written notice of the alleged violation and date when the commission provided public notice of the standard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 19.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.12.

(a) On or before January 1, 2019, the commission, in consultation with the Contractors’ State License Board, local building officials, and other stakeholders, shall approve a plan that will promote compliance with Part 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations in the installation of central air conditioning and heat pumps.

(b) Before approving the plan described in subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Evaluate the best available technological and economic information to ensure that data collection and its use is feasible and achievable at a reasonable cost to government, industry, and homeowners.

(2) Consider the impact of the plan on all of the following:

(A) Property owners.

(B) The heating, ventilation, and air conditioning industry, including manufacturers, distributors, and contractors.

(C) Local governments.

(D) Building officials.

(E) The Contractors’ State License Board.

(3) Provide the public with the opportunity to review and comment on the proposed plan.

(c) The commission may adopt regulations to increase compliance with permitting and inspection requirements for central air conditioning and heat pumps, and associated sales and
 installations, consistent with the plan approved pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 206.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.13.

Beginning with the triennial review of Part 6 (commencing with Section 100.0) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations that is pending as of January 1, 2024, the commission shall consider revising the definition of “conditioned space, indirectly” for purposes of those regulations to include sealed and unvented attics, where the space is enclosed by the primary thermal and air barrier and directly adjoining conditioned space.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (SB 837)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.16.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Benchmarking data” means data delivered to the commission pursuant to Section 25402.10.

(2) “Covered building” means any building subject to the benchmarking regulations adopted pursuant to Section 25402.10.

(3) “Fuel-related emissions of greenhouse gases” means emissions of greenhouse gases from the onsite usage of fuels or emissions of greenhouse gases from the offsite production of steam or other forms of thermal energy, or from locally generated electricity, as
 part of a district energy system, but excludes emissions of greenhouse gases associated with electricity from the electrical grid that is used by a covered building.

(4) “Harassment” means an act that is unlawful pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1940.2 of the Civil Code, a misrepresentation made to a tenant that the tenant is required to vacate a rented area, or any other act defined as harassment by an applicable city, county, or city and county ordinance.

(5) “Under-resourced community” has the same meaning as defined in Section 71130.

(b) On or
 before July 1, 2026, the commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, Public Utilities Commission, and Department of Housing and Community Development, shall develop a strategy for using benchmarking data to track and manage the energy usage and emissions of greenhouse gases of covered buildings in order to achieve the state’s goals, targets, and standards related to energy usage and emissions of greenhouse gases of covered buildings, including both of the following targets:

(1) The annual targets for statewide energy efficiency savings and demand reduction established pursuant
 to subdivision (c) of Section 25310.

(2) The greenhouse gas emission reductions targets for the building sector established by the State Air Resources Board as part of achieving the economywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions required pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(c) In developing the strategy pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Avoid increasing utility and rental cost burdens for, or causing evictions, harassment, or displacement of, tenants of covered buildings. For purposes of this paragraph, the commission shall consider including the following requirements as part of the strategy:

(A) Requirements to prohibit a renovation to a covered building that is required by the strategy from being a basis for terminating a tenancy and to ensure that any temporary relocation costs resulting from the renovation is paid for by the covered building owner.

(B) Requirements to
 prohibit an increase in rent for a tenant as a result of a renovation to a covered building that is required by the strategy or to limit the increase in rent to the long-term energy savings to a tenant resulting from the renovation.

(2) Assess the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of building upgrades available to covered building owners for achieving increased energy efficiency and reductions of the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(3) Provide flexibility, to the extent feasible, for covered building owners to select among technology options and to align the timing of building upgrades with equipment replacement cycles.

(4) Encourage equitable access to jobs and other economic opportunities that may result from increased
 investment in covered building upgrades.

(5) Prioritize reductions in fuel-related emissions of greenhouse gases because the state has already established targets, pursuant to Section 454.53 of the Public Utilities Code, for reducing, and ultimately eliminating, indirect emissions of greenhouse gases associated with electricity.

(6) Prioritize efficiency and decarbonization measures that will benefit tenants, including measures that reduce tenants’ energy costs and remove indoor environmental hazards.

(7) Consider including a
 process by which a covered building owner can propose, and the commission, or a local city or county building department to which the commission delegates this authority, may approve or reject, an alternative compliance
 plan. An alternative compliance plan shall, consistent with paragraph (1), avoid increasing utility and rental cost burdens for, or causing evictions, harassment, or displacement of, tenants.

(8) Consider authorizing a local jurisdiction to implement its own program for increasing energy efficiency and reducing the